Utah statutes.
67-5-1.5.   Special duties -- Employment of staff.

(1)  The attorney general may undertake special duties and projects as follows:

(a)  employment of child protection services investigators under Section 67-5-16;

(b)  employment of an Obscenity and Pornography Complaints Ombudsman under Section 67-5-18;

(c)  administration of the Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force under Section 67-5-20;

(d)  administration of the Internet Crimes Against Children (ICAC) Unit under Section 67-5-21;

(e)  administration of the Identity Theft Reporting Information System (IRIS) Program under Section 67-5-22;

(f)  administration of the Attorney General Crime and Violence Prevention Fund under Section 67-5-24;

(g)  administration of the Safety Net Initiative as provided under Section 67-5-26; and

(h)  administration of the Mortgage and Financial Fraud Unit under Section 67-5-30.

(2)  As permitted by the provisions of this chapter, the attorney general may employ or contract with investigators, prosecutors, and necessary support staff to fulfill the special duties undertaken under this section.



Amended by Chapter 350, 2012 General Session

